Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-195
Assessments and promotional materials.

(1) The Nebraska Brand Committee may contract to collect assessments made by any public, quasi-public, or private agency or organization on the sale of cattle, beef, and beef products in Nebraska by producers and importers of such cattle, beef, and beef products. The brand committee may charge such agency or organization for collection of the assessments. The charge for collection of assessments shall be used to cover administrative costs of the brand committee, but such charge shall not exceed five percent of the assessments collected.

(2) The brand committee may authorize and direct its employees to disseminate or otherwise distribute various materials promoting the cattle industry.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 26;

Laws 2017, LB600, § 5.